src-fst-morphology-stems-adjectives.lexc.md
# Norwegian Bokmål Adjectives

This file documents the Bokmål adjective stem file [stems/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-nob/blob/main/src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc).

## Overview of the declension classes

----------------------------------------------------
Main types, from Bokmålsordboka

a1 god god godt gode
a2 billig billig billig billige
a3 ekte ekte ekte ekte
a4 oppskjørtet oppskjørtet oppskjørtet oppskjørtede/oppskjørtete
a5 makaber makaber makabert makabre
a5 lunken lunken lunkent lunkne
aV blå blå blått blå
... and some irregular ones

AdjectiveRoot is the list of adjectives (some 5500 stems)
* få: A_FÅ ; 
* små: A_SMÅ ; 
* vond: VOND ; 

* artikkelbasert a2 ; 
* aggressiv a1 ; 
* avbøtende a3 ; 
* bundet a4 ; 

* dritredd a2 ; 
* dritsur+v1:drit#sur a1 ; 
* dritsur+v2:dritt#sur a1 ; 
* ...

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-nob/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc)</small>

---
